Georgia, session 2025_26, SB6.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 26-3-22 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to other laws
unaffected by the "Georgia Drug and Cosmetic Act," is amended by revising subsection (a)
as follows:
"(a) This chapter shall be cumulative and supplemental to any and all existing laws relating
to the subject matter of drugs. Specifically, nothing contained in this chapter shall be so
construed as to relieve any person, firm, or corporation from complying with any
requirements as prescribed by Chapter 4 of this title, Article 3 of Chapter 13 of Title 16,
the 'Dangerous Drug Act,' Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 16, the 'Georgia Controlled
Substances Act,' or Title 21 C.F.R. 210, the federal 'current good manufacturing practices
S. B. 6
- 1 -

LC 52 0718S (SCS)
in manufacturing, processing, packing, or holding of drugs: general'; provided, however,
that any testing drug analysis equipment used to determine whether a controlled substance
or its packaging has been adulterated and contains a synthetic opioid shall not be
considered a drug related object as defined by Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 16."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 6
- 2 -